Maryland, session 2025, HB0485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
11–720.
(a) This section applies only in St. Mary’s County.
(b) (1) The Sheriff may establish:
(i) a home detention program;
(II) A DAY REPORTING PROGRAM;
[(ii)] (III) a work release program;
(IV) AN IN–PATIENT TREATMENT PROGRAM;
[(iii)] (V) a pretrial release SUPERVISION program; and
[(iv)] (VI) a prerelease program.
(2) (i) If the Sheriff establishes a program under this section, the
Sheriff shall adopt regulations necessary to implement each program established.
– 1 –

Ch. 131 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) If a condition that a court imposes on an [incarcerated]
individual is inconsistent with a regulation adopted under this subsection, the condition
imposed by the court controls as to that [incarcerated] individual.
(c) (1) At the time of [sentencing] A COURT PROCEEDING or at any time
during an individual’s [confinement] PARTICIPATION IN A PROGRAM, the court may
allow the individual to participate in any program established under this section if the
individual:
(i) is [sentenced] COURT–ORDERED to the custody of the Sheriff;
and
(ii) has no other charges for a felony or a [violation of a] crime of
violence as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal Law Article pending in any jurisdiction.
(2) An [incarcerated] individual who is participating in any program
established under this section and who is [sentenced to the] AUTHORIZED TO
PARTICIPATE IN A St. Mary’s County Detention and Rehabilitation Center PROGRAM
may [leave the detention center to], WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE SHERIFF OR THE
SHERIFF’S DESIGNEE:
(i) continue regular employment;
(ii) seek new employment;
(iii) attend any court–ordered treatment appointments;
(iv) receive intensive counseling;
(v) obtain academic education; or
(vi) maximize use of other community resources or other similar
rehabilitative activities.
(d) [(1)] The Sheriff or the Sheriff’s designee [shall collect the earnings of an
incarcerated individual participating in a program established under this section, less any
payroll deduction required by law.
(2) From the earnings of the incarcerated individual, the Sheriff may
deduct:
(i) the amount determined to be the cost to the county of providing
food, lodging, clothing, and transportation for the incarcerated individual;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 131
(ii) actual and necessary food, travel, and other expenses incidental
to the incarcerated individual’s participation in the program;] MAY DIRECT AN
INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATING IN A PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION TO
PROVIDE PROOF THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS MADE PAYMENTS TOWARD ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING OBLIGATIONS:
[(iii)] (1) an amount the [incarcerated] individual is legally
obligated [or desires] to pay for the support of a dependent;
[(iv) if applicable, a reasonable amount to repay the State or the
county for an attorney appointed by the court; and]
[(v)] (2) court–ordered payments for restitution[.
(3) The Sheriff shall:
(i) credit to the incarcerated individual’s account any remaining
balance; and
(ii) dispose of the balance in the incarcerated individual’s account as
the incarcerated individual requests and the Sheriff approves]; OR
(3) COURT–ORDERED FEES OR FINES.
(e) (1) If an [incarcerated] individual violates a trust or a condition that a
court or Sheriff has established for participating in any program established under this
section, the Sheriff or the Sheriff’s designee shall notify the court in writing of the violation.
(2) An [incarcerated] individual who violates a trust or a condition that a
court or Sheriff has established for participating in any program established under this
section is subject to:
(i) removal from the program; and
(ii) cancellation of any earned diminution of the [incarcerated]
individual’s term of confinement.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –